Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-215 Readjustment of premiums;
dividends. (a) Any contract of group disability insurance or group life
insurance may provide for the readjustment of the rate of premium based on
experience at the end of the first year or of any subsequent year of insurance,
and such readjustment may be made retroactive only for the policy year.

(b) If a policy dividend is declared or a
reduction in rate is made or continued under any group insurance policy, the
excess of the aggregate dividends or rate reductions under the policy and all
other group insurance policies of the policyholder over aggregate expenditure
for insurance under such policies made from funds contributed by the
policyholder, or by an employer of insured persons, or by a union or association
to which insured persons belong, including expenditures made in connection with
administration of such policies, shall be applied by the policyholder for the
sole benefit of insured employees. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next